test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-tiiqedw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - tīʼedõ: # Verb 6 'eng /est teha/fin' - full paradigm
     tīʼedõ+V+Inf: [tīʼedõ, tīedõ]
     tīʼedõ+V+Ger: [tīʼedsõ, tīedsõ]
     tīʼedõ+V+Sup: [tīʼemõ, tīemõ]
     tīʼedõ+V+Sup+Ine: [tīʼemõõs, tīemõõs]
     tīʼedõ+V+Sup+Ela: [tīʼemõõst, tīemõõst]
     tīʼedõ+V+Sup+Tra: [tīʼemõõks, tīemõõks]
     tīʼedõ+V+Sup+Abe: [tīʼemõõt, tīemõõt]
     tīʼedõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [tīʼeb, tīeb]
     tīʼedõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [tīʼetõ, tīetõ]
     tīʼedõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [tīʼebõd, tīebõd]
     tīʼedõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: tei
     tīʼedõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: teitõ
     tīʼedõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: teitõ
     tīʼedõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: [tīʼe, tīe]
     tīʼedõ+V+Cond+Sg3: [tīʼeks, tīeks]
     tīʼedõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: [tīʼe, tīe]
     tīʼedõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: [tīʼe, tīe]
     tīʼedõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: [tīʼegid, tīegid]
     tīʼedõ+V+Jus+Sg3: [tīʼegõ, tīegõ]
     tīʼedõ+V+QuoSg3: [tēʼji, tēji]
     tīʼedõ+V+ActPrfPrc: [tīʼend, tīend]
     tīʼedõ+V+PssPrfPrc: [tīʼedõd, tīedõd]
